Hawaii statutes.
§271-11 Copies of schedules, tariffs,
contracts, etc., kept as public records; evidence. The copies of
schedules and classifications and tariffs of rates, fares, and charges, and all
contracts, agreements and arrangements between motor carriers filed with the
public utilities commission as herein provided, and the statistics, tables, and
figures contained in the annual or other reports of carriers made to the
commission as required under this chapter shall be preserved as public records
in the custody of the commission (except any contract, agreement, or
arrangement between a contract carrier by motor vehicle and a shipper shall
only be made public as provided in section 271-25), and shall be received as
prima facie evidence of what they purport to be for the purpose of
investigations by the commission and in all judicial proceedings; and copies of
and extracts from any of the schedules, classifications, tariffs, contracts,
agreements, arrangements, or reports, made public records as aforesaid,
certified by the commission under the commission's seal, shall be received in
evidence with like effect as the originals. [L 1961, c 121, pt of §2; Supp,
§106C-9; HRS §271-11]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next